Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1630
Commissioner decision; aggrieved party; hearing and review; notify board.

If, upon written notification of any such action taken by the commissioner, the aggrieved party desires a hearing and review, such party shall so notify the board in writing within ten business days after the giving of notice of such action. If such notice is not given, the action shall be deemed final. Upon receipt of such notice from the aggrieved party, the board shall fix the time and place for a hearing and shall notify the aggrieved party by certified mail.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 30;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2830;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 30.